Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1273
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(1) That the availability of business development services
at various geographic locations throughout the state would result in the retention,
expansion, and diversification of existing businesses and the creation of
new businesses;

(2) That the
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may authorize the
Nebraska Business Development Center as a department of the University
of Nebraska at Omaha. The Nebraska
Business Development Center, if authorized under this section, may provide business development
services through a network of small business development centers at: (a) Chadron State College,
Peru State College, and Wayne
State College, if authorized by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges; and (b) the University of Nebraska at Kearney, the University
of Nebraska-Lincoln, and the
University of Nebraska at Omaha, if
authorized by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska;

(3) That business development services may be augmented through
specialized research and technical assistance services; and

(4) That the Existing Business Assistance Division of the
Department of Economic Development shall coordinate, administer, and support
the delivery of such services.

Laws 1987, LB 736, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 5.